Massachusetts, session 194th, S1989.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2A of chapter 65C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “commonwealth”, in line 3, the following words:-
"; provided, however, that no tax shall be imposed on the transfer of an estate valued at or less
than $5,000,000."
of 1